Nebraska, session 109, LB1007.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1007 LB1007
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 76-1415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1415 (1) No rental agreement may provide that the tenant:
(a) Agrees to waive or to forego rights or remedies under the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act;
(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out
of the rental agreement;
(c) Agrees to pay the landlord's or tenant's attorney's fees; or
(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the
landlord arising due to active and actionable negligence of the landlord
or to indemnify the landlord for that liability arising due to active and
actionable negligence or the costs connected therewith; or .
(e) Agrees not to disclose the contents of the rental agreement.
(2) A provision prohibited by subsection (1) of this section
included in a rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord
deliberately uses a rental agreement containing provisions known by him
or her to be prohibited, the tenant may recover actual damages sustained
by him or her and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 2. Section 76-1416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1416 (1) A landlord may not demand or receive security, however
denominated, in an amount or value in excess of one month's periodic
rent, except that a pet deposit not in excess of one-fourth of one
month's periodic rent may be demanded or received when appropriate, but
this subsection shall not be applicable to housing agencies organized or
existing under the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.
(2) Upon termination of the tenancy, property or money held by the
landlord as prepaid rent and security may be applied to the payment of
rent and the amount of damages which the landlord has suffered by reason
of the tenant's noncompliance with the rental agreement or section
76-1421. The balance, if any, and a written itemization shall be
-2-

LB1007 LB1007
2026 2026
delivered or mailed to the tenant within fourteen days after the date of
termination of the tenancy. If no mailing address or instructions are
provided by the tenant to the landlord, the landlord shall mail, by
first-class mail, the balance of the security deposit to be returned, if
any, and a written itemization of the amount of the security deposit not
returned to the tenant's last-known mailing address. If the mailing is
returned as undeliverable, or if the returned balance of the security
deposit remains outstanding for one year, it shall be considered
abandoned property to be reported and paid to the State Treasurer in
accordance with the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.
(3) If a landlord receives a payment of prepaid rent or security
prior to entering into a rental agreement and the tenant thereafter
declines to enter into such agreement, the landlord shall return such
prepaid rent or security.
(4) (3) If the landlord fails to comply with subsection (2) or (3)
of this section, the tenant may recover the property and money due him or
her, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees. In addition, if the
landlord's failure to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section
is willful and not in good faith, the tenant may recover an amount equal
to one month's periodic rent or two times the amount of the security
deposit, whichever is less, as liquidated damages.
(5) (4) This section does not preclude the landlord or tenant from
recovering other damages to which he or she may be entitled under the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act. However, a tenant shall not
be liable for damages directly related to the tenant's removal from the
premises by order of any governmental entity as a result of the premises
not being fit for habitation due to the negligence or neglect of the
landlord.
(6) (5) The holder of the landlord's interest in the premises at the
time of the termination of the tenancy is bound by this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 76-1415, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-3-

LB1007 LB1007
2026 2026
Nebraska, and section 76-1416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-